portugues.dict
abarcar/XYMDn
abeirar/XYM
abnegar/XYBcD
abotoar/XYSD
abrir/XYM
acalmar/XYM
acartar/XYM
acender/XYMDvR
achincalhar/XY
acionar/XYMDv
acobertar/XY
acompadrar/XY
aconsoantar/XY
acostar/XYSMv
acurar/XY
adejar/XY
adicionar/XYcMDv
administrar/XYcDn
adolescer/XY
adscrever/XY
afadigar/XY
afidalgar/XY
afixar/XYcv
afoitar/XY
afrancesar/XY
afrontar/XYcMD
agasalhar/XYD
aglomerar/XYcn
agrafar/XY
agudizar/XYc
ajanotar/XY
ajustar/XYRSMDnv
alastrar/XYMD
alcatifar/XY
aleijar/XYM
alfaiar/XY
algaliar/XYc
alijar/XYM
almocrevar/XY
alourar/XY
aludir/XY
alvorecer/XY
amalgamar/XY
amarelar/XY
amarujar/XY
ameigar/XYD
amimar/XYD
amolecar/XY
amorenar/XY
amotinar/XYScD
amuar/XYM
anarquizar/XYc
anedotizar/XY
anichar/XY
anodizar/XYcMD
antemover/XY
antropomorfizar/XY
apalacianar/XY
apanicar/XY
aparelhar/XYSM
apavonar/XY
aperaltar/XY
apincelar/XY
aplainar/XYcMD
apolvilhar/XY
apostolizar/XYc
apregoar/XY
aprimorar/XYM
aprovisionar/XYM
aquartelar/XYM
aradar/XY
arejar/XYMD
armadilhar/XYS
arrancar/XYMD
arrebitar/XY
arreganhar/XY
arremessar/XYMD
arretar/XY
arrolar/XYM
artificiar/XY
asneirar/XYcMD
assapatar/XY
assenhorar/XYM
assimilar/XYcv
assocializar/XYc
assotar/XY
atacanhar/XY
atarantar/XYcM
atediar/XY
aterraplenar/XY
atirar/XYD
atomizar/XYc
atrapalhar/XYcD
atrincheirar/XY
aturar/XYDv
auscultar/XYcD
automatizar/XYc
avaladar/XY
aventar/XY
avilanar/XY
aviventar/XYD
azeitonar/XY
bacharelar/XY
baforar/XY
baldar/XY
banhar/XY
barreirar/XY
batotar/XY
bedelhar/XY
benzer/XYMD
betonar/XY
bigamizar/XY
bisbilhotar/XY
blindar/XY
bolhar/XYn
bordejar/XY
bradar/XY
brejeirar/XY
brochar/XYD
bular/XY
cabriolar/XY
cadastrar/XY
calcetar/XYM
calhar/XY
calvar/XY
candongar/XY
cantarolar/XY
captar/XYcD
carbonizar/XYcDv
carnalizar/XYc
carunchar/XY
castelhanizar/XY
catedratizar/XY
caucionar/XYn
cavar/XYcD
celeumar/XY
cerrar/XYcM
chamejar/XYn
chapiscar/XY
chilrar/XY
chofrar/XY
chutar/XY
cilindrar/XY
cinzar/XY
circunstanciar/XY
clamar/XYcDn
clemenciar/XY
coabitar/XYcDn
coalhar/XYM
cochichar/XYD
coitar/XY
coligar/XYc
comandar/XYn
comiserar/XYcD
comparar/XYcDv
compenetrar/XYc
comprar/XYDv
comutar/XYcDv
concessionar/XYu
concubinar/XY
conectar/XYS
confinar/XYcnM
confundir/XYv
conhecer/XYSMDnv
conservar/XYcDnv
consorciar/XY
consubstanciar/XYc
contemporizar/XYcDn
contorcionar/XY
contramandar/XY
contraprovar/XY
conturbar/XYcD
convolver/XY
copiar/XYD
corporizar/XYc
corricar/XY
coser/XYD
cozer/XYMD
crepusculizar/XY
cristalizar/XYcDv
crucifixar/XYcD
cumprimentar/XYD
custar/XY
dealbar/XY
debulhar/XYD
decidir/XY
decotar/XYD
defensar/XYv
degelar/XYD
deixar/XY
delongar/XYD
demover/XYMv
depenar/XY
depravar/XYcD
derreter/XYM
desacatar/XYM
desairar/XY
desancar/XYD
desapontar/XYM
desarrochar/XY
desatarraxar/XY
desautorizar/XYc
desbotar/XYM
descaracterizar/XYc
descender/XYMn
descompadrar/XYB
desconjuntar/XYB
descortinar/XYv
desdentar/XY
desembolsar/XY
desencapotar/XY
desencovar/XY
desengarrafar/XY
desenjoar/XY
desensaboar/XY
desenvencilhar/XY
desestagnar/XY
desfilar/XY
desfranzir/XY
desgrilhoar/XY
desinfetar/XYDn
desleixar/XYB
desmanchar/XY
desmobilar/XY
desnutrir/XYc
desparafusar/XY
despersonalizar/XYc
despoetizar/XYcD
desprender/XYM
desquitar/XYc
desterroar/XYM
destronar/XYM
desvariar/XY
desvirtuar/XYcM
devastar/XYcD
dicionarizar/XYc
digressionar/XY
direcionar/XYRM
disformar/XY
disseminar/XYcD
distanciar/XYMc
ditongar/XYc
doar/XYcD
domesticar/XYcDv
dramatizar/XYcSD
eclipsar/XY
efeminizar/XY
eletrolisar/XYc
emadeirar/XYM
embalsamar/XYcMDn
embarrancar/XY
embatucar/XY
emblemar/XY
embotar/XYM
embrutecer/XYMD
emitir/XYn
empancar/XYMS
emparedar/XY
empenhar/XYMDvB
empobrecer/XYM
empreender/XYMD
emular/XYDc
encaixar/XYRSMn
encanastrar/XY
encapotar/XYB
encardir/XYSM
encascar/XY
encavalitar/XY
enchusmar/XY
encomendar/XYSc
encorrilhar/XY
encruar/XY
endeusar/XYMD
enegrecer/XYM
enfastiar/XYMn
enfestar/XY
enformar/XYDS
engaiolar/XYM
engasgar/XYM
engodar/XY
engraxar/XYMD
enlambuzar/XYM
enquistar/XY
enriquecer/XYMD
enrugar/XYSM
ensarilhar/XYM
entabuar/XY
entender/XYMD
entontar/XY
entreabrir/XY
entroncar/XYM
enunciar/XYcDv
envergonhar/XY
enxaropar/XY
epigrafar/XY
erigir/XYv
esbeltar/XY
escacar/XY
escamar/XYc
escarnecer/XYMDv
escavar/XYcD
escoriar/XYc
escudar/XY
esfalfar/XYMn
esfumar/XYc
esgueirar/XY
esmurrar/XY
espanholizar/XY
especar/XY
espetar/XY
espionar/XY
esposar/XY
esquematizar/XY
estacionar/XYM
estanhar/XYD
estetizar/XY
estivar/XYcD
estradar/XY
estrelar/pXYn
estrumar/XYc
esturrar/XY
etilizar/XY
evolucionar/XY
exceder/XYnv
exemplificar/XYc
exorbitar/XYn
expetorar/XYcn
exprimir/XYv
extraditar/XY
exultar/XYcn
fadigar/XYS
falhar/XYM
fanicar/XY
fartar/XYcv
favorecer/XYSDM
feirar/XYn
ferrolhar/XY
filiar/XYcR
fingir/XYMDB
flautar/XY
focalizar/XYc
fomentar/XYcD
fornicar/XYcD
fosforizar/XYc
fragmentar/XYcS
fresar/XYD
fumegar/XYn
fustigar/XYcDn
galgar/XYc
gangrenar/XY
garimpar/XY
gatinhar/XY
generalizar/XYcDvB
girar/XYcDn
golfejar/XY
gozar/XY
granizar/XYD
gravitar/XYcn
grudar/XYDS
guilhotinar/XYM
harmonizar/XYcDv
heroificar/XY
hipertrofiar/XYn
honestizar/XY
humilhar/XYcnD
ilegalizar/XYcD
imbecilizar/XY
imortalizar/XYcDv
impingir/XY
importunar/XYcD
improvar/XYcDv
inabilitar/XYcn
incestar/XY
incompatibilizar/XY
inculpar/XYcv
indicar/XYcD
indrominar/XY
inervar/XYc
infernar/XY
infligir/XY
inicializar/XYRc
inquinar/XYcM
insolar/XYc
instigar/XYcD
insurgir/XY
intentar/XY
interessar/XYSnB
interpolar/XYcD
intimidar/XYcD
inundar/XYcnv
inveterar/XYc
irmanar/XY
isentar/XY
jejuar/XYD
judiciar/XY
labutar/XYcD
ladroar/XY
lamentar/XYcDB
lapidar/pXYc
latinizar/XYcn
legar/XYc
lenhar/XYD
levar/XYMn
lidar/XYcD
listar/XY
locomover/XY
lubricar/XY
luxar/XYc
madurar/XYD
maleabilizar/XY
maltratar/XY
mandriar/XY
manjar/pXY
maquinar/XYcD
marimbar/XY
martelar/XYD
massajar/XYScMn
matracar/XY
mecanizar/XYc
medrar/XY
melodramatizar/XY
mensurar/XYcDv
mesurar/XY
mexer/XYD
militarizar/XYSc
minimizar/XYc
miserar/XY
mobilar/XYcD
moinar/XYn
molinhar/XY
montar/XYSDnv
morfinizar/XY
motinar/XY
multiplicar/XYcDvS
murmurar/XYcDn
namoriscar/XY
naufragar/XYnv
neutralizar/XYcn
nitrar/XYc
nomenclar/XYD
nutrificar/XY
obscurantizar/XY
ocidentalizar/XYc
oferendar/XY
omitir/XY
operar/XYcDnv
orbitar/XY
orlar/XY
ostracizar/XYn
ovalar/pXY
pactuar/XYn
palatalizar/XYc
palmatoriar/XY
pandegar/XY
parafinar/XY
parcializar/XYc
participar/XYcDnv
passivar/XY
patrocinar/XYD
pedalar/XY
penar/XYc
pensar/XYRMDn
perdigotar/XY
perfumar/XYDn
permeabilizar/XYc
perscrutar/XYcDv
pertencer/XYn
peticionar/XY
pilar/pXY
pintalgar/XY
pisar/XYRMD
plastificar/XYn
pojar/XYn
pomificar/XY
pornografar/XY
posterizar/XY
pranchar/XY
preconizar/XYcD
preestabelecer/XY
premeditar/XYc
preocupar/XYcn
presentar/XYc
prestigiar/XYScDn
principiar/XYDn
processar/XYMDvER
profundar/XYv
prolongar/XYcMvB
propalar/XYMn
prosperar/XY
prototipar/XY
publicar/XYcDvE
pulverizar/XYcD
quadricular/XY
quebrar/XYcM
quitar/XYcMD
raivecer/XY
rastejar/XYMDn
reacusar/XYc
rebanhar/XY
recapturar/XY
reclamar/XYcDnv
recortar/XYD
redestilar/XY
refastelar/XY
reforjar/XY
regatar/XY
reinar/XYn
relatar/XYv
rematar/XYcD
rendar/XY
repassar/XY
reprovar/XYcDv
resenhar/XY
resplandecer/XYn
ressuscitar/XYcDv
retesar/XYMD
retrincar/XY
reverificar/XYcD
ribombar/XYn
rogar/XYcDn
ruborescer/XY
sacholar/XY
salubrificar/XYc
satirizar/XY
selecionar/XYDvE
seringar/XYD
simplificar/XYcDv
soar/XYn
sobrescrever/XY
soldar/XYDv
sonorizar/XYc
subentender/XYM
subsistir/XY
suicidar/XY
supervisionar/XY
suspender/XY
tarar/XY
teleguiar/XY
terraplanar/XY
tisnar/XYD
topografar/XY
traficar/XYn
transitivar/XY
trasladar/XYcDv
tresnoitar/XY
trocadilhar/XY
uivar/XYDn
usar/XYv
varar/XYcD
vendar/XYv
verticalizar/XYc
violar/XYcDv
vitimar/XYD
volver/XY
zurrar/XYD
alvoraçar/XY
arruçar/XY
calçar/XYD
debruçar/XY
embaraçar/XYDn
envidraçar/XYM
forçar/XYMD
rechaçar/XY
